Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1208
Severability.

If any section or provision of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional or otherwise void or invalid for any reason, such determination shall not affect the validity of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act as a whole or any part thereof, other than the part so determined to be unconstitutional or otherwise void or invalid.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 431, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 22.